Hawaii, session 2026, SB518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The department of land and natural resources shall update the online permitting service, wiki permits, which allows authorized applicants to reserve and purchase right-of-entry permits for commercial activity on unencumbered land, specifically, state public beaches, pursuant to section 13-221-35, Hawaii Administrative Rules, to include the following information: (1)  A list of all available locations on unencumbered land for which a right-of-entry permit may be reserved using the wiki permits service; and (2)  Issue a public notice if a location is to be removed from the list of available locations; provided that the department shall seek public input for or against the proposed removal. The department of land and natural resources shall refund any fees paid for a right-of-entry permit that was issued for a commercial activity if the department removes the permitted location from the list of available locations before the commercial activity occurs. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________